texlive2021/texmf-dist/tex/generic/dehyph-exptl/dehyphn-x-2021-02-26.pat
\patterns{%
.ab3a
.abb2
.ab5erk
.ab5er4r
.abi2
.ab3it
.ab3l
.ab5le
.ab3ol
.ab3or
.ab3sa
.ab5so
.ab3u
.achse4
.ach4sp
.achts4
.ack4e
.ade3n4
.ae2
.aer6schl
.ago3
.ag4r
.ag2u
.ai2s
.ak6t5en6de.
.ak6t5en6den
.ak6t5en6des
.ak3tr
.al4bl
.alb3r
.al4bra
.alb6rec
.ale3u4
.ali3
.al5l6en
.alle4r5
.al4lin
.all5s
.al4mau
.al5s4e
.al4t5ak
.al6t5ang
.alt6an6l
.al4tei
.al4t5e4l
.al6t5er6f
.al6t5er6p
.alter6s5
.al4t3h
.al4ti
.al4tor
.al4t5ra
.al4tri
.al4tro
.alt3s4
.al4t3u
.al4u
.alu3s
.ampe4
.am5sta
.amt4s3
.ana3c
.an3ae
.an5alg
.ana3t
.anden6ke
.an3e
.ang4a
.an5g4li
.ang4r
.ang4s4
.angst5
.ani4s
.anis5c
.ank2
.anla6gentec
.an3n4a
.an3o2
.an4ora
.an5sa
.ansch4
.an4si.
.an5s4p
.an4tag
.anti5s
.anz2
.ap5p6le.
.are3n
.ar4m5ac
.ar4mar
.ar4mau
.ar4mei
.ar4mun
.ar4sc
.ar4tan
.ar4t5ei
.arter4
.ar6t5erh
.ar6t5erk
.ar4t3r
.arz2
.arzt3
.as2b
.asbe4
.asie4
.as4ko
.as2p
.as4ta.
.as5tar
.as4zen
.ata3
.ate4m3
.at4h
.aue4n3
.au2f3
.auf5s4
.auge4
.au2s3
.aussen6dung.
.au4sti
.auto6ren.
.auto6rin
.ax2
.är6schl
.ät2h
.ät2s
.bahner6
.ba4ran
.bau5chi
.bau3f
.be5erb
.beige4
.bei6ge.
.be3n4a
.be3n4e
.be3r4a
.ber4e
.ber4ga
.berg5ab
.berg5ar
.berg5ast
.ber6g5e6b
.ber6gin
.ber4gl
.ber4g5o
.ber4g5r
.berg5s
.ber4tr
.be3s4a
.bi2e
.bi2o
.bi4os
.bi4t3a
.bi4t3r
.blau3
.blei5s4
.boge4
.bogen5
.bogens6
.bor4d5i
.bo4s3k
.bre4a
.brecher6
.bre6cherk
.brid4
.briefen6
.brie6f5end
.bruch5s
.brut5s
.bu6cher
.buchse6
.bue5be
.bu4ser
.buster6
.buß3
.bü3be
.by2t
.ce4ra
.ch2
.ch4a
.char6me.
.char6mes
.ch4i
.chi5er
.dab2
.da6ch5en
.da3la
.dan4c
.da2r
.dar5in
.dar4m3
.dar3u
.da4te.
.da4tes
.daue4
.de4al
.de6ck5eri
.dein4
.de5ins
.de5int
.de6m5ents
.de3na
.den4ka
.den4kl
.den4ko
.den4kr
.de3od
.de5ran
.de4rei
.de5r4en
.de5skr
.des4pe
.de4spo
.des5se
.de3st
.des4ti
.de3xa
.di2a
.di5ae4r
.di3ä4r
.di2e
.die5ne
.dien6st
.dienst5a6d
.dienst5r
.di5s4ti
.do4mo
.dorf3
.dor6fer
.do4tr
.dru6ckerz
.due3b
.du6schr
.dü3b
.dy2s3
.ebe4r
.echo3
.eck5erk
.ede4l
.ehe3i
.ehe3n
.ehre4
.eh4r5er
.eichs4
.eich5ste
.ei3e2
.eier3
.eigener6
.ei4lau
.ein3a
.ei4nat
.eine4
.ei4n5eb
.ei6n5en6g
.eins4p
.einzel6lig
.eisen5
.ei4spe
.eis3s4
.ei4s3t
.ei6ste
.ei4s3u
.ei4tr
.ek5lam
.ek3li
.ek3s
.el4a
.elas3
.el4b3i
.el4bl
.elb5s
.el4fei
.elfen5
.elfens6
.el4fl
.en1
.en4d3a
.en4d5ei
.ender4
.en6d5ere
.en6d5erf
.en6derg
.en6d5erz
.en4d3r
.end3s
.en4due
.en4dü
.en4g3l
.enk2
.en4t3a
.en4tä
.en4t5ei
.en4tem
.en5thalp
.en4thi
.en4t5io
.en4toe
.en4t3r
.en5trep
.en5trop
.ent3s4
.epi3c
.ep3o4d
.er4b5ei
.er4b5er
.er6brecht
.er4bu
.er6d5achs
.er4dan
.er4dar
.er4d5ei
.er4del
.erden6k
.er4d5ep
.er4d5er
.ere5ch
.er3ei
.er3er
.erfolgsauto6
.er3in
.erk2
.er3o4b
.er3oe
.ers2
.er6st5ein
.er6ster6
.erst5eri
.erst5ers
.er6stim
.er6stritt.
.er6stritten.
.er4z5el
.erzen4
.er6z5eng
.er4z5er
.es3p
.es4s3t
.es3ta4
.es3te
.es5tra
.est5ri
.et2h
.et2s
.eu1
.eu3g2
.eur4
.eu3t
.eve4r3
.ex3em
.fahrzeugin6
.fang5s
.faus6t5r
.fe3la
.fel4d5r
.fel6lau
.fel4sp
.fel4s5t
.fer4n5o
.fe4st
.fi3d
.fi5est
.fi4le.
.fi4len
.film5a
.fil4s3
.fin4s
.fi2r
.flu4g3
.flus6s5en
.for5tu
.fra4s
.fs2
.fu4sc
.fus4st
.ga4me.
.ga4mes
.gan4ga
.gang5sc
.ga2s
.gas3e
.gas5tei
.gas6tras
.ga2t
.geb2
.gebe4a
.gege4n
.gel4b5r
.ge3lu
.ge5nae
.ge5nar
.ge5nas
.ge5naug
.ge3ne
.gene5cke
.gen4ei
.ge3nu
.ger4a
.ger4e
.ge3ro
.ge3ru
.ge3sa
.ges4e
.ges4i
.ges4p
.ge7stei
.ge3t4u
.gi2u
.gla4s5c
.gol6der
.gs2
.gu3ru
.hafe4
.haft5r
.hal4br
.han4a
.han4fa
.hang5s
.ha5sche
.hauser6w
.hau4su
.hau4t
.haut5o
.he2r
.her6b5ra
.he5rer
.he3ri
.he6r5inn
.he5ros
.he4sp
.hete3
.he3xa
.hi2n
.hin3a
.hin3u
.hi4s
.ho4f5en
.hof3r
.hof3s4
.ho4la
.ho4met
.ho3ra
.hor4t5r
.höch4s
.hu4fer
.hu3la
.hund4
.hu3s4a
.ia2
.ibe3
.ima4ge
.imm4
.immen4
.in1
.ind2
.ink4
.inn5st
.inse4l5
.inu3
.io2d3
.ioni5e
.ire3
.is2a
.it2h
.joni3
.jor3
.kabe4
.ka4b5l
.ka3la
.kal4ta
.kal4t5r
.ka3mi
.ka4t5i4o
.ke3ra
.ker4bl
.ker4na
.ke3ro
.ke2t
.ki2e
.ko4ten
.ko4ter
.kraf4
.kraft5
.ks2
.kue3b
.ku4ran
.kü3b
.laden5s
.la5ert
.lage4n5
.la3ho
.lan4d5a
.lan6de6mi
.lan4dr
.lan4gl
.lan4g5r
.lang5s
.lan3t
.lase4
.las4t5r
.le4ar
.le4gas
.leh4m5e
.lei4bl
.lei4br
.lei4tr
.le3n4i
.len4kl
.les3t
.le3th
.lich6ter6sc
.li2f
.li3o
.li4ve.
.lo4g5in
.lo4sc
.losch5
.lo4sk
.los3s4
.los3t
.lo4tr
.lo5ver
.lus4t5e
.luster6
.lut4h
.ly2s3
.ma5lae
.ma5le
.man3d
.mani4e
.man5t
.mas4s5u
.ma4st
.ma4ß3u
.mat4c
.mate3
.md2
.mee4ru
.mel4a
.me3no
.men6schl
.men6schw
.me4sa
.mes4sp
.mes4st
.met6tend
.mi2e
.mie4t5r
.mi2f
.mil4z3
.mi4s3a
.mi6scha
.mi6schl
.mi6schn
.mi6scho
.mi6sch5r
.mi6sch5w
.mi2t
.mit3a
.mit3e
.mit5in
.mm2
.mo2i
.mo4nau
.mon6dru
.möbe4
.musiker6fo
.nabe4
.nae4s5c
.na4ha
.nah5ei
.namens5
.na4mes
.nas4s5c
.na3t4h
.na3to
.nä4s3c
.nebe4n5
.neider6
.nere3
.ner4f
.ne3ro
.ne2s
.neuer6b
.nich6t5e
.ni2e
.ni2l
.nil3a
.no6tentr
.no4t3h
.no4top
.not3r
.nude4
.nul6ler
.nus2
.nu4t3r
.oa3s
.obe4n
.obe6r5ei
.ob6ers
.ob3i4t
.ob3l
.ob4sta
.oe2
.oh4r5ei
.oh4rer
.oper4
.orge4
.orgi3
.ort4s
.orts5a
.orts5e
.os4t3a4
.ost5ec
.os4t5ei
.os4tel
.os6t5en6de
.os6teng
.oste6r5e
.os4tes
.os4ti
.osto4
.ost5om
.ost3r
.ot3a
.ou4te
.ozo2
.ölk2
.pa3b2
.pa4nen
.par4ka
.par4k5l
.par5th
.pas6sers
.pe4c
.pe3la
.pel4za
.pel4zw
.pe3na
.peri3
.pes4t5e
.pes4th
.pf2
.pf4u
.ph2
.po4lei
.po6lende.
.po6lenden
.postei6
.prach4
.pu5ert
.ra5ch6e
.ra4d5ei
.ra4der
.ra3el
.ran4d5r
.ran6g5e6b
.ran4gl
.rar4s
.rau5f4r
.rau4m3
.rau6schl
.rau6schw
.re4b3l
.re5cha
.re5chr
.rei4bl
.re5insz
.reise5i
.rei4st
.reli5e
.ren4n5a
.re3sk
.rester6
.res6t5ers
.re5stit
.rest5re
.re3un
.ri4as
.ro2a
.roe4s
.roes5c
.ro4h3a
.roher4
.ro6h5erz
.rom4a
.roset6te.
.ro4tan
.ro4tau
.rot5ei
.ro4t3r
.rö2s
.rös3c
.rue3b
.rue6ck5er6
.ruh4r3
.ru4m3e
.runder6
.rü3b
.rü6ck5er6
.sa3br
.sa4fe
.sali5e
.sami3
.sau3c
.sch4
.scha4c
.schaf6t5end
.scheiner6
.se2a
.se2e
.see3i
.seein4
.see5r
.se4ha
.seh5ere
.se4hi
.se4h3o
.sen4f
.senf5l
.sen4kr
.se5no
.sen3s
.se3ro
.se3r4u
.se2t
.sex5tr
.sha2
.si2e
.siege6s5
.si3er
.si4ern
.si3es
.si3gn
.silbe4
.si4te
.sit6zer
.ski3e
.ski3s4
.sli2
.so3n4a
.sour4
.spani5er.
.spiege6lei
.st2
.st4a
.sta4ge
.stau6be6cken.
.st4e
.ste4h5a
.ste4i
.steiner6k
.ster6na
.sto4n
.sto4re
.st4r
.stro6ma
.su6cherf
.su6cher6g
.sue3b
.sumpf5l
.ta3c
.tage4s5
.ta5lar
.tan4k5a
.tan4k5l
.tan4ko
.tart4
.ta4tab
.ta4t3h
.ta4top
.ta4tor
.ta4tri
.ta4t3u
.tau4f5o
.tau6schl
.te2e
.te2f
.tehe5
.tei4l5a
.tei4l5ä
.teiler6s
.tei6l5ersc
.tei4l5i
.teils4
.te5in.
.te5le
.telle4
.te3ra
.te4st
.test5ae
.test5ä
.te6ste
.test5ei
.tester6h
.test5r
.te4te
.te3xa
.texter6
.ti2a
.tie6f5ern
.ti4me.
.ti4mes
.ti2s
.tischen6
.tisch5end
.tisch5l
.tisch5w
.tit2
.tit4a
.tite4
.tode4
.to4der
.todes5
.to4nar
.to4nat
.tonen4
.to6n5eng
.toner6n
.toner6z
.to4nin
.ton3s4
.to4pan
.top3e
.to4pl
.to4pr
.tor5an
.to4rei
.to4th
.to4t3r
.to2w
.tra4de
.trag5s
.tri5es
.tsa3
.ts4c
.tse3
.ts4u3
.tu4e
.tu5end
.tu3ri
.tur4m3
.ub2
.ue2
.ue4b
.ufe2
.ufer3
.uh3l
.ul2b3
.um1
.ume2
.umo2
.ums2
.un3a2
.unab3
.un3dr
.une2
.unen4t5
.un3er
.un3g2
.unge5n4
.uni4t
.unk2
.un3s
.uns4t
.ur3a4d
.ur3a4m
.ur4anb
.uran6fa
.ur6anfo
.ur4anp
.ur3at
.ur3c
.ur3e
.ur4e3t
.ur4i
.uro3
.ur3o4m
.ur3o4p
.ur3s2
.ut3r
.ves3t
.vi3d
.vol6lerw
.wah4l3
.wah4n3
.wanderer6
.ware4
.waren5
.wa2s
.we4bei
.weg3s4
.weh4r5u
.weine4
.wei6neb
.weines6
.we6ing
.wei4ta
.welter6k
.welt5s
.wer6k5er6
.wer4k5r
.wer4tr
.wese4
.wetterer6
.wi2e
.win6d5er5
.winte4
.wor2
.worten6
.wort5end
.xan3
.xe1
.ya2l
.zeit5r
.zeit5s4
.zel4l5a
.zelle4
.zel6leb
.zel4li
.zel4th
.ze3ro
.zi4e
.zie4l5u
.zin4ka
.zin4s5c
.zin4st
.zi6schl
.zol6lers
.zuch4
.zu5ende.
.zu4gei
.zu4glo
.zu4g5ra
.zug5st
.zurue4
.zurü4
.zwe2
.zweigen6
.zwei6g5end
a1ab
a2aba
aa2be
a3ace
a3achs
a1ae2
aa2gr
aags2
a3akt
aal3ac
aal3an
aal3ec
aa4lei
aalf2
aa2l3o
aal3ö
aals4t
aal5ste
a1an
a3an.
a2anä
a1a2q
aa2r3a
aa3re
aa4r3ei
aa4r5ers
3aarg4
aar3in
aa4rit
aa4r3oe
aar3ö
aarp2
aar3z
3aase
a3ass
aa2su
aata2
aa2t3h
aa2t3r
aat2s3
aatsche6
a1au
a1ä2
2abah
abais4
ab4ak
2abal
ab3alt
ab2am
2a3bas
abat4t5a
ab3auf
ab1ä
ab2äu
abbe4p
4abbin
abb5rig
1abd
abda3c
2abe.
2abec
ab3eic
abe3id
ab3eil
abein4s
abein4t
4a3b4el
abel5ac
abel5a4d
abel5in
4aben.
a4berd
aber4ka
ab3erz
aber4zi
aber4zo
abe4s5en
abes4p
ab5esse
2a3bet
1abf
1abg
1abh
4abil
ab3inf
ab3inh
ab3ins
ab3iso
abi3s4t
1abk
ab1l
a2bla
ab3lag
3ablas
3ablau
a4bläu
4ab4le.
3a4bled
3ablei
4a3blem
4ab4ler
4ablet
a4bleu
a4blin
a4bloe
ab4log
a2blö
1abn
ab2o
3a2bo.
2abod
2aboe
2abol
a2bon
abor5ang
abo5rato
abor3s
2abot
2ab2ö
ab1r
ab3rec
ab3rie
ab4rot
2abrö
3abruf
1abs
2abs.
4absap
4absar
ab3sc
ab3se
2absf
ab3so
4ab4sof
abs2p
4abspi
abs4pr
4abst.
ab3sta
ab4s5tro
3abtei
abtes3
3abtr
2abu
a4bueb
ab4ug
a2bum
ab3usu
a2büb
1abw
2aby
1abz
ab5zun
2ac.
2aca
1ac1c
a3cee
a3cem
a3cen
2ach.
ach3ab
ach5aen
ach3ak
ach3an
a5chari
ach5art
ach3as
ach3au
ach3än
2achb
a3che
a4ch3e4c
ach5eic
ach5ein
ach5eis
a4ch3ep
ach5erbe.
ach5erben
ach5erbes
ach5erfu
ach5erfü
ach5erke
ach5erkl
a4ch5erl
a6cherne
a4chero
a4cherö
a4ch5erw
a4ch5erz
ache5str
ach5eta
2achf
achgene6r
2achh
4achi
a4ch3i4d
ach5ind
2achk
2ach3l
ach5le
2ach3m
ach5mi
ach3n
2acho
a3cho.
ach3o4b
a3choh
ach5ord
ach5org
ach5ori
a3chos
a3chov
ach3öf
2achp
2ach3r
4achs.
4achsc
4achses
4achso
4achsp
achst4
ach5stre
ach3su
ach4tak
ach6tant
acht5erfu
acht5erte
4achtg
ach4t5in
4achtk
ach4t5or
ach6traeume.
ach6traeumen.
ach6träume.
ach6träumen.
ach6trit
4achtsc
ach4t5um
ach3u4f
ach3uh
a3chus
2achv
2ach3w
a1ci
acin3
4ack.
a4ckeg
4a3cken
acken5s
a4ckerd
4ackes
a4ck3in
4acks
acksau6s
ack5sta
acksta6g
ack5sti
2a1cl
a3co
acon4n
ac2p
2acu
2ad.
4ada.
ad4abr
a2dad
a2dae
ad2ag
a2d3a2k
ad3ang
3adap
ada4rer
4adas
a4daut
1a2dä
ad3än
ad1c
2a3de.
ade4al
ad5eben
a3dec
ade3e
adefi4
adel6spo
3adelu
2aden
ade4nat
adenes4
adenk4r
aden4se
ade3o2
ade5ram
a4d3erf
a4derig
ader4sa
a5deru
a4d3erz
ade5s4p
ades4s
ade5stel
ade5str
2adf
adgas3
2adh
adie4s5c
adie6s5el
a4d3inf
1adj
2admu
a2dob
ado3c
ado4n3a
adon3e
a2dop
ad4o3s
adot2
2adp
2adq
adrat5s4
a2dre
3adres
ad4ret
ad3rot
ad3rue
ad3run
ad3rü
2ads2
3adsor
2ad2t1
adte2
adto2
adt3re
a2düb
1adv
2ae.
aea2
aeap2
ae2bl
aechen5
aech4sa
ae3chu
2aeck
aeck5sp
ae2da
ae4ders
aede3s4
ae4d3ia
aedi4e
ae2dr
2ae1e
aee2k3
ae2f3l
ae2fr
aefts3
2aeg
ae2ga
aeg3an
ae4g5ent
ae2gl
ae2gr
aeg3ri
aeg5sta
aeg5s4tr
3aegy
ae2ha
4aehe
ae4h3ei
ae4hel
ae4h3in
aeh4l5ei
4aehm
3aehnl
2aehr
2aeht
2aei
ae3im
a3ein
ae5isch.
ae5ischl
ae5ischs
ae3isk
a3eiw
ae2kr
a3el.
ael4bl
a3elh
ae4lia
aelk3s4
a5ella.
ael4lak
a3ello
ael4pl
a3els.
a3el4sa
a3elsb
ael6schl
a3elsf
a3elsg
a3elsk
a3elso
ael4st
a5elsta
a3elsv
ael3t4e
aelte5i
4aemm
aemte4
2aen.
2aene
aene4n3
aen2f3
4aenge
2aeni
aen3k4e
aen4kl
aenne4
aenner5
2aens
aen4s3a
aen4s3c
aen4sp
ae3nu
2aenz
ae2o3p2
5aepfel
a3e2pi
1ae2q
2aer.
aer3a2
3aera.
ae3r4af
ae4rap
ae4rat
aerauto6
aerb3l
aer4ble
4aerd
ae4r3ei
ae4r3e4l
aere4m
ae4r5emi
aere4n
aer5enzy
ae4r5erf
ae4r5erh
aerer4k
aer5ersa
ae4rese
aeri4e
ae4r5ing
4aerk
aer4mau
aer4mo
aer6munt
ae3ro
3aerod
ae4rop
ae4ror
aero3s
a3ersa
aer4seh
aers5er
aert6er
aert4s3
ae4rue
a3erwä
aer6z5en6t
aer6z5err
2aes4e
ae3se3i
aese5rei
aese5ri
ae3skr
ae2sp
aes4s3c
aess5erwe
aes4so
ae4st
aestein6
3aesth
aeß5erk
aeß5erw
ae4t3a
aeta4b
aete3e
aeteo4
aet5erbl
ae2th
4aeto
ae4tob
ae4t3ra
ae4t3ri
ae4t3ro
aet4sen
ae2u
aeu4eri
2aeuf
3aeugi
5aeugle
4aeul
2aeum
4aeur
aeu5re
4aeus.
aeu6scha
aeu6schr
aeu4sp
ae2vi
a1e2x
2afa
a4f3aen
a2f3a2n
a2fap
a2f3au
2afä
a2f3än
2afe
a2f3ec
a4f5einh
a4f5einr
a4fentl
a2f3e2p
afe2r
a2fex
aff4a
3affär
3affek
af4flu
aff2r
2afi
afi2e
afie3i
afie3s
afi6k5anz
afi4kat
afi4k3l
a4f3ins
afi2t
2afl
af3lae
af3lä
2afo
a4fo4ber
a2f3oc
a4ford
a4f3ort
afo3s
2afra
af3rae
af3rat
af3rau
af3rä
af3rie
a3fris
2af2ro
af3roe
af3rö
af3run
af1s
af3sa
af2si
afs4ke
afs2t
af4t3ak
aft5anz
af4t3au
af4tei
af4t3e4l
af4t5ent
aft2h
aft5int
af4toe
af4t3op
af2tö
aft5rad
aft5rei
af4t5res
aft5ric
aft5rin
aft4sei
aft4sel
aft4spi
af4tur
2afu
a2f3um
a2f3ur
2afü
afür3
2aga
ag3a2d
aga3t
a2g3au
agd3an
ag4dar
ag4del
ag4det
ag4din
ag4dre
ag4dro
4age.
ageb2
age5inf
age5inh
age5in4s
2agel
age6lei6s
age4len
age4ler
4a5gen.
age4nas
agend4
age4n5e4b
a6generg
agens4p
a4gent.
5a6genten
a4g5entf
age4rad
age4r5af
age4ral
age4r5ap
age6rauf
agerei6g
ager6eign
agerer6f
age3ro
age4s5am
age4s5an
age4sau
ages3k
age4s5oe
age4sö
ages6sen
age3u
3aggr
a2g3i2d
ag3ill
a2g3im
ag3inn
